Utah statutes.
31A-5-701.   General reporting requirement.
(1)  An insurer domiciled in this state shall file a report with the
commissioner disclosing any transaction listed in Subsection (2), unless the
transaction has been submitted to the commissioner for review, approval, or
information purposes pursuant to other provisions of this title or rules or
other requirements made pursuant to this title.
(2)  A report is required under Subsection (1) to disclose:
(a)  material acquisitions and dispositions of assets; or
(b)  material nonrenewals, cancellations, or revisions of ceded reinsurance
agreements.
(3)  The report required in Subsection (1) is due within 15 days after the end
of the calendar month in which any of the transactions described in Subsection
(2) occurs.
(4) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), reports obtained by or
disclosed to the commissioner pursuant to this part are confidential and are
not subject to subpoena and may not be made public by the commissioner or any
other person or organization, without the prior written consent of the insurer
to which it pertains.
(b) (i)  The commissioner may publish all or any part of a report in the
manner the commissioner considers appropriate if the commissioner determines
that the interest of policyholders, shareholders, or the public will be served
by publication, after giving notice and an opportunity to be heard to the
insurer who would be affected.
(ii)  All or any part of a report may be disclosed without notice or consent
to insurance departments of other states.
